Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-207.01
Commercial lessor, defined.

Commercial lessor shall mean a person, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or organization which owns or is a lessee of premises which are offered for leasing to a licensed organization on which bingo is or will be conducted.

Laws 1988, LB 295, § 3;

Laws 1991, LB 427, § 6;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 107.